Hawaii statutes.
[§624D-7] Application to pending actions. This
chapter applies to requests for discovery in cases pending on April 12, 2012.
[L 2012, c 17, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"April 12, 2012" substituted for "the
effective date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next